Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1210
Local field offices.

The department may establish local field offices to assist in discharging departmental responsibilities and to ensure accessibility of departmental services for persons with developmental disabilities and their families throughout the state.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 10.